Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2147
False reporting; criminal penalty.

Any officer, director, or employee of an insurance holding company system who willfully and knowingly subscribes to or makes or causes to be made any false statements, false reports, or false filings with the intent to deceive the director in the performance of his or her duties under the Insurance Holding Company System Act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 27.